Vermont statutes. TITLE 3A Executive Orders
Chapter 20. Internal Security and Public Safety
This Addendum 1 to the Amended and Restated Executive Order shall take effect upon signing and shall continue in full force and effect until midnight on August 15, 2020, at which time the Governor, in consultation with the Vermont Department of Health
and the Department of Public Safety shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend this Addendum.

Dated July 15, 2020

ADDENDUM 2 TO AMENDED AND RESTATED EXECUTIVE ORDER NO. 01-20

[Strengthening the Use of Facial Coverings]

Rescinded by Addendum 15 to Amended and Restated Executive Order No. 01-20 (codified as Executive Order 20-59), dated April 30, 2021.

ADDENDUM 3 TO AMENDED AND RESTATED EXECUTIVE ORDER NO. 01-20

[Extension of State of Emergency Declared March 13, 2020]

WHEREAS, since December 2019, Vermont has been working in close collaboration with the National Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (“CDC”) and with the United States Health and Human Services Agency to first monitor and plan for outbreaks of a
respiratory illness due to a novel coronavirus (“COVID-19”) and then to implement measures to keep Vermonters healthy and safe; and

WHEREAS, the Governor directed the Vermont Department of Health (“VDH”) to activate the Health Operations Center in February 2020 when VDH began to monitor and later, test Vermonters who may have been exposed to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, in March 2020, the Governor directed the Department of Public Safety, Division of Vermont Emergency Management (“DPS”) to assemble an interagency taskforce, and later to activate the Vermont State Emergency Operations Center (“SEOC”), in accordance
with the State Emergency Management Plan, to organize prevention, response and mitigation efforts and share information with local and state officials; and

WHEREAS, on March 7, 2020 and March 11, 2020, VDH detected the first two cases of COVID-19 in Vermont; and

WHEREAS, on March 11, 2020 the World Health Organization made the assessment that COVID-19 can be characterized as a pandemic; and

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, the Governor issued Executive Order 01-20, Declaration of State of Emergency in Response to COVID-19 and National Guard Call-Out (“Executive Order”), declaring a state of emergency for the State of Vermont in response
to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, President Trump issued a national emergency declaration for the COVID-19 pandemic; and

WHEREAS, the Governor, in consultation with VDH, DPS and the Vermont Agency of Human Services, initiated aggressive and sustained efforts to protect property and public health, and to ensure public safety in this public health emergency including issuing
the Executive Order, as supplemented and amended and Directives issued pursuant to the Executive Order, to limit in-person contact, such as limiting the size of gatherings, closure of schools and the institution of remote learning
through the end of the 2019-2020 school year, directing the postponement of non-essential medical and surgical procedures, suspending the operation of close contact businesses, requiring telecommuting and work from home, requiring
Vermonters to stay home and stay safe, with exceptions for essential purposes, and suspending the operation of businesses which were not deemed critical to public health and safety and national and economic security; and

WHEREAS, modeling studies done for the State clearly show that, but for the mitigation measures taken to date, the number of COVID-19 cases and COVID-19 related deaths in the State would be having a much more devastating effect on Vermonters and would
be threatening to overwhelm the capacity of the Vermont health care system; and

WHEREAS, the Governor has undertaken a cautious, measured and data-based approach to restarting Vermont’s economy to minimize the risk to the public by limiting the spread of infection in our communities in order to protect the most vulnerable, while
reopening our business, non-profit, government and recreation sectors in a safe and effective way; and

WHEREAS, numerous tools needed to address response efforts remain in place by virtue of the State of Emergency declaration, including protections for residents of long term and other medical care facilities, National Guard resources standing by to implement
hospital surge capacity and for emergency food distribution, workplace health and safety requirements, a mandate for facial coverings, expanded housing and meal delivery systems, expanded eligibility for unemployment insurance,
tools needed by certain businesses to maintain a minimum level of economic sustainability and federal emergency funding; and

WHEREAS, the General Assembly has passed a number of COVID-19-related measures dependent on the existence of a declared State of Emergency which provide flexibility regarding unemployment insurance, assist Vermonters with motor vehicle licensing and other
matters, impose moratoria on evictions and water and sewer service disconnection, protect Vermonters in public meeting settings and provide municipalities flexibility with budgeting and municipal taxes; and

WHEREAS, the Governor has determined, in consultation with the Commissioner of VDH and DPS, based on the best science and data available, to extend the State of Emergency for the State of Vermont through Tuesday, September 15, 2020 and provide flexibility
to cities and towns to act to further restrict group size and limit the hours of alcohol sales in bars and clubs in their jurisdictions.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont by the Constitution of the State of Vermont, the emergency powers set forth in 20 V.S.A. §§ 8, 9 and 11 and other laws, hereby declare the State of Emergency
for the State of Vermont shall be extended through midnight on Tuesday, September 15, 2020.

IT IS FURTHER ORDERED:

1.
Except as set forth herein, the Amended and Restated Executive Order issued June 5, 2020, and all Addenda and Directives issued thereunder, shall continue in full force and effect until midnight on September 15,
2020, at which time the Governor, in consultation with the VDH and DPS shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend the State of Emergency.

2.

Authority of Vermont Cities and Towns.

A.

Gathering Size.
Notwithstanding gathering size limitations established by Executive Order or guidance issued by the Agency of Commerce and Community Development, the legislative body of each city and town may enact local requirements
regarding gathering size limitations that are more restrictive than those established by the State.

B.

Alcohol Sales.
The Rules of the Department of Liquor and Lottery (DLL) are hereby supplemented to authorize the legislative body of each city and town to prescribe shorter hours than those hours set forth in the Rules of DLL,
for the sale by bars and clubs licensed by DLL of malt, vinous, spiritous and spirit-based beverages.

3.

Temporary License Plates.
The Commissioner of the Department of Motor Vehicles shall develop processes for the issuance of temporary electronic in-transit registration plates and permits for all types of vehicles which are sold and transported
to or within and registered in Vermont. These temporary plates and permits shall be valid for up to 60 days.

This Addendum 3 to the Amended and Restated Executive Order shall take effect upon signing and shall continue in full force and effect until midnight on September 15, 2020, at which time the Governor, in consultation with the Vermont Department of Health
and the Department of Public Safety shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend this Addendum.

Dated August 14, 2020

ADDENDUM 4 TO AMENDED AND RESTATED EXECUTIVE ORDER 01-20

[Expansion of Child Care to School-Age Children in Family Child Care Homes]

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, the Governor issued Executive Order 01-20, Declaration of State of Emergency (“Executive Order”), as amended and restated June 15, 2020 (“Amended and Restated Executive Order”), declaring a state of emergency for the
State of Vermont in response to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, the Governor, in consultation with the Vermont Department of Health (VDH), Department of Public Safety/Division of Emergency Management (DPS), the Vermont Agency of Human Services (AHS) and the Agency of Education (AoE), initiated aggressive
and sustained efforts to protect property and public health, and to ensure public safety in this public health emergency including issuing the Executive Order, as supplemented and amended, and Directives issued pursuant to
the Executive Order, to limit in-person contact, such as limiting the size of gatherings, closure of schools and the institution of remote learning through the end of the 2019-2020 school year, directing the postponement of
non-essential medical and surgical procedures, suspending the operation of close contact businesses, requiring telecommuting and work from home, requiring Vermonters to stay home and stay safe, with exceptions for essential
purposes, and suspending the operation of businesses which were not deemed critical to public health and safety and national and economic security; and

WHEREAS, modeling studies done for the State clearly show that, but for the mitigation measures taken to date, the number of COVID-19 cases and COVID-19 related deaths in the State would be having a much more devastating effect on Vermonters and would
be threatening to overwhelm the capacity of the Vermont health care system; and

WHEREAS, in mid-April, the Governor began to undertake a cautious, measured and data-based approach to restarting Vermont’s economy to minimize the risk to the public by limiting the spread of infection in our communities in order to protect the most
vulnerable, while reopening our business, non-profit, government and recreation sectors in a safe and effective way; and

WHEREAS, this cautious, data-driven approach has allowed for the restart of every sector of the Vermont economy to some degree, while maintaining containment of the spread of COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, based on the best scientific evidence available to the experts at VDH, AoE and leading pediatric medical professionals and educators, the Governor imposed a statewide uniform start date for Vermont schools of September 8, 2020; and

WHEREAS, an analysis of AoE’s enrollment data, by county and grade, estimates if 25% of K-6 students require child care during remote learning days, the number of day care openings required could exceed 10,000; and

WHEREAS, multiple return to school models being pursued throughout the state create a significant, immediate need for child care for school age child care on remote learning days as families return to work.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont by the Constitution of the State of Vermont, the emergency powers set forth in 20 V.S.A. §§ 8, 9 and 11 and other laws, hereby order the following measures
to rapidly expand child care capacity in the State for school age children.

1.

Expand Child Care to School-Age Children in Family Child Care Homes.
In accordance with the authority granted to the Governor pursuant to 20 V.S.A. §§ 8 and 9 to make, amend, and rescind necessary orders, rules, and regulations for emergency management purposes, I hereby adopt
the following rule for the purpose of interpreting the scope of

33 V.S.A. § 3511(7)
, relating to the exceptions to limits on child care provided in family home settings. The intent of this rule is to clarify an exception for remote learning is consistent with the policy intent of the exceptions
afforded by

33 V.S.A. § 3511(7)
, which allows exceptions for school closing days, snow days and vacation days. This clarification will result in an increase in school age full-time child care capacity statewide.

A.
For purposes of this Addendum 4 to the Amended and Restated Executive Order, the following term is defined as set forth below to provide further detail to the scope of the exceptions provided in 33 V.S.A. § 3511(7).
The following term is defined as set forth below:

(i).
“Family child care home” means a child care facility which provides care on a regular basis in the caregiver’s own residence for not more than 10 children at any one time. Of this number, up to six children may
be provided care on a full-time basis and the remainder on a part-time basis. As used in this subdivision, care of a child on a part-time basis shall mean care of a school-age child for not more than four hours a day. These
limits shall not include children who reside in the residence of the caregiver.

These part-time school-age children may be cared for in a family child care home on a full-day basis during school closing days, remote-learning days, snow days, and vacation days which occur during the school year.

2.

Authority of the Secretary of the Agency of Human Services.
With respect to child care programs, the Secretary of AHS shall oversee the implementation of this Addendum 4 to the Amended and Restated Executive Order and I hereby delegate to the Secretary of AHS such further
authority to undertake measures to expand the State’s capacity for school-age child care, which may include, but not be limited to:

A.
Supporting the development of child care facilities for school age children to receive child care on remote learning days. These sites would allow for flexibility based on the region’s K-12 education models. These
sites could be established in school buildings, recreational buildings, municipal buildings and summer camp buildings to leverage existing spaces that historically care for children. These sites could also be established upon
application by employers, or in collaboration between the State and employers.

B.
With the approval of the Governor, making the necessary orders and making, amending and rescinding the necessary rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of this Addendum 4 to the Amended and Restated
Executive Order. This may include, but not be limited to, such changes necessary to collaborate with community partners and employers to operate these new child care facilities similarly to summer recreation programs and day
camps.

C.
Expediting administrative processing and increasing administrative flexibility for applicants seeking to become a regulated child care program, which may include granting provisional licensure to programs while
they pursue full licensure, granting variances to licensing regulations and expedited division reviews.

3.
All State Agencies shall collaborate and align resources as directed by the Secretary of AHS, in consultation with the Governor, to support child care providers in accordance with this Addendum 4 to the Amended
and Restated Executive Order.

4.
State Agencies shall collaborate on continuity of mental health services to children and their families as directed by the Secretary of AHS, in consultation with the Governor.

5.
All child care providers shall follow guidance issued by the Agency of Commerce and Community Development and VDH to ensure all children and employees are safe and healthy.

Addendum 4 to the Amended and Restated Executive Order shall take effect upon signing and shall continue in full force and effect until midnight on September 15, 2020, at which time the Governor, in consultation with the Vermont Department of Health and
the Department of Public Safety shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend this Addendum.

Dated August 18, 2020

ADDENDUM 5 TO AMENDED AND RESTATED EXECUTIVE ORDER 01-20

[Extension of State Emergency Declared March 13, 2020]

WHEREAS, since December 2019, Vermont has been working in close collaboration with the National Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (“CDC”) and with the United States Health and Human Services Agency to first monitor and plan for outbreaks of a
respiratory illness due to a novel coronavirus (“COVID-19”) and then to implement measures to keep Vermonters healthy and safe; and

WHEREAS, the Governor directed the Vermont Department of Health (“VDH”) to activate the Health Operations Center in February 2020 when VDH began to monitor and later, test Vermonters who may have been exposed to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, in March 2020, the Governor directed the Department of Public Safety, Division of Vermont Emergency Management (“DPS”) to assemble an interagency taskforce, and later to activate the Vermont State Emergency Operations Center (“SEOC”), in accordance
with the State Emergency Management Plan, to organize prevention, response and mitigation efforts and share information with local and state officials; and

WHEREAS, on March 7, 2020 and March 11, 2020, VDH detected the first two cases of COVID-19 in Vermont and as of September 9, 2020, the State has experienced 1,654 cases and 58 deaths which are COVID-19 related; and

WHEREAS, on March 11, 2020 the World Health Organization made the assessment that COVID-19 can be characterized as a pandemic; and

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, the Governor issued Executive Order 01-20, Declaration of State of Emergency in Response to COVID-19 and National Guard Call-Out (“Executive Order”), declaring a state of emergency for the State of Vermont in response
to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, President Trump issued a national emergency declaration for the COVID-19 pandemic; and

WHEREAS, the Governor, in consultation with VDH, DPS and the Vermont Agency of Human Services, initiated aggressive and sustained efforts to protect property and public health, and to ensure public safety in this public health emergency including issuing
the Executive Order, as supplemented and amended and Directives issued pursuant to the Executive Order, to limit in-person contact, such as limiting the size of gatherings, closure of schools and the institution of remote learning
through the end of the 2019-2020 school year, directing the postponement of non-essential medical and surgical procedures, suspending the operation of close contact businesses, requiring telecommuting and work from home, requiring
Vermonters to stay home and stay safe, with exceptions for essential purposes, and suspending the operation of businesses which were not deemed critical to public health and safety and national and economic security; and

WHEREAS, modeling studies done for the State clearly show that, but for the mitigation measures taken to date, the number of COVID-19 cases and COVID-19 related deaths in the State would be having a much more devastating effect on Vermonters and would
be threatening to overwhelm the capacity of the Vermont health care system; and

WHEREAS, the Governor has undertaken a cautious, measured and data-based approach to restarting Vermont’s economy to minimize the risk to the public by limiting the spread of infection in our communities in order to protect the most vulnerable, while
reopening our business, non-profit, government and recreation sectors in a safe and effective way; and

WHEREAS, numerous tools needed to address response efforts remain in place by virtue of the State of Emergency declaration, including protections for residents of long term and other medical care facilities, National Guard resources standing by to implement
hospital surge capacity and for emergency food distribution, workplace health and safety requirements, a mandate for facial coverings, expanded housing and meal delivery systems, expanded eligibility for unemployment insurance,
tools needed by certain businesses to maintain a minimum level of economic sustainability and federal emergency funding; and

WHEREAS, the General Assembly has passed a number of COVID-19-related measures dependent on the existence of a declared State of Emergency which provide flexibility regarding unemployment insurance, assist Vermonters with motor vehicle licensing and other
matters, impose moratoria on evictions and water and sewer service disconnection, protect Vermonters in public meeting settings and provide municipalities flexibility with budgeting and municipal taxes; and

WHEREAS, the Governor has determined, in consultation with the Commissioner of VDH and DPS, based on the best science and data available, to extend the State of Emergency for the State of Vermont through Tuesday, September 15, 2020, clarify the use of
facial coverings when engaged in strenuous activity and clarify the delegated authority of the Secretary of Administration for State agency and department return to the worksite.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont by the Constitution of the State of Vermont, the emergency powers set forth in 20 V.S.A. §§ 8, 9 and 11 and other laws, hereby declare the State of Emergency
for the State of Vermont shall be extended through midnight on Thursday, October 15, 2020.

IT IS FURTHER ORDERED:

1.
Except as set forth herein, the Amended and Restated Executive Order issued June 5, 2020, and all Addenda and Directives issued thereunder, shall continue in full force and effect until midnight on October 15,
2020, at which time the Governor, in consultation with the VDH and DPS shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend the State of Emergency.

2.

Masks or Cloth Facial Coverings Required in Public Wherever Close Contact is Unavoidable.
Section 7(f) of the Amended and Restated Executive Order regarding Mask Use is hereby amended in part to clarify mask use when engaged in strenuous activity, as follows:

Nothing in this Order or any other State health and safety guidance shall require the use of a mask or cloth facial covering when someone is engaged in strenuous exercise or activity when physical distance of six (6) feet can be consistently maintained,
for anyone under the age of 2, any child or adult with a medical or developmental issue or challenge that is complicated or irritated by a facial covering, anyone with difficulty breathing or as further set forth in guidance
issued by VDH.

3.

Authority of the Secretary of the Agency of Administration.
For the sake of clarity, the Secretary of the Agency of Administration is delegated the authority, in consultation with the Commissioner of VDH and with the approval of the Governor, to issue guidance to State
agencies, departments and employees on return to the worksite, with the exception of DMV which shall be responsible for implementing its Continuity of Operations Plan. The Secretary, in consultation with the Commissioner of
VDH and the Secretary of the Agency of Commerce and Community Development, may update and modify the mitigation requirements and procedures regarding the return to the worksite of State government entity operations.

This Addendum 5 to the Amended and Restated Executive Order shall take effect upon signing and shall continue in full force and effect until midnight on October 15, 2020, at which time the Governor, in consultation with the Vermont Department of Health
and the Department of Public Safety shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend this Addendum.

Dated September 11, 2020

ADDENDUM 6 TO AMENDED AND RESTATED EXECUTIVE ORDER 01-20

[Extension of State Emergency Declared March 13, 2020]

WHEREAS, since December 2019, Vermont has been working in close collaboration with the National Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (“CDC”) and with the United States Health and Human Services Agency to first monitor and plan for outbreaks of a
respiratory illness due to a novel coronavirus (“COVID-19”) and then to implement measures to keep Vermonters healthy and safe; and

WHEREAS, the Governor directed the Vermont Department of Health (“VDH”) to activate the Health Operations Center in February 2020 when VDH began to monitor and later, test Vermonters who may have been exposed to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, in March 2020, the Governor directed the Department of Public Safety, Division of Vermont Emergency Management (“DPS”) to assemble an interagency taskforce, and later to activate the Vermont State Emergency Operations Center (“SEOC”), in accordance
with the State Emergency Management Plan, to organize prevention, response and mitigation efforts and share information with local and state officials; and

WHEREAS, on March 7, 2020 and March 11, 2020, VDH detected the first two cases of COVID-19 in Vermont and as of October 13, 2020, the State has experienced 1,886 cases and 58 deaths which are COVID-19 related; and

WHEREAS, on March 11, 2020 the World Health Organization made the assessment that COVID-19 can be characterized as a pandemic; and

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, the Governor issued Executive Order 01-20, Declaration of State of Emergency in Response to COVID-19 and National Guard Call-Out (“Executive Order”), declaring a state of emergency for the State of Vermont in response
to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, President Trump issued a national emergency declaration for the COVID-19 pandemic; and

WHEREAS, the Governor, in consultation with VDH, DPS and the Vermont Agency of Human Services, initiated aggressive and sustained efforts to protect property and public health, and to ensure public safety in this public health emergency including issuing
the Executive Order, as supplemented and amended and Directives issued pursuant to the Executive Order, to limit in-person contact, such as limiting the size of gatherings, closure of schools and the institution of remote learning
through the end of the 2019-2020 school year, directing the postponement of non-essential medical and surgical procedures, suspending the operation of close contact businesses, requiring telecommuting and work from home, requiring
Vermonters to stay home and stay safe, with exceptions for essential purposes, and suspending the operation of businesses which were not deemed critical to public health and safety and national and economic security; and

WHEREAS, modeling studies done for the State clearly show that, but for the mitigation measures taken to date, the number of COVID-19 cases and COVID-19 related deaths in the State would be having a much more devastating effect on Vermonters and would
be threatening to overwhelm the capacity of the Vermont health care system; and

WHEREAS, the Governor has undertaken a cautious, measured and data-based approach to restarting Vermont’s economy to minimize the risk to the public by limiting the spread of infection in our communities in order to protect the most vulnerable, while
reopening our business, non-profit, government and recreation sectors in a safe and effective way; and

WHEREAS, numerous tools needed to address response efforts remain in place by virtue of the State of Emergency declaration, including protections for residents of long term and other medical care facilities, National Guard resources standing by to implement
hospital surge capacity and for emergency food distribution, workplace health and safety requirements, a mandate for facial coverings, expanded housing and meal delivery systems, expanded eligibility for unemployment insurance,
tools needed by certain businesses to maintain a minimum level of economic sustainability and federal emergency funding; and

WHEREAS, the General Assembly has passed a number of COVID-19-related measures dependent on the existence of a declared State of Emergency which provide flexibility regarding unemployment insurance, assist Vermonters with motor vehicle licensing and other
matters, impose moratoria on evictions and water and sewer service disconnection, protect Vermonters in public meeting settings, stay the statute of limitations in civil litigation, supplement child care assistance and provide
municipalities flexibility with budgeting and municipal taxes; and

WHEREAS, the Governor has determined, in consultation with the Commissioner of VDH and DPS, based on the best science and data available, to extend the State of Emergency for the State of Vermont through Sunday, November 15, 2020.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont by the Constitution of the State of Vermont, the emergency powers set forth in 20 V.S.A. §§ 8, 9 and 11 and other laws, hereby declare the State of Emergency
for the State of Vermont shall be extended through midnight on Sunday, November 15, 2020.

IT IS FURTHER ORDERED:

1.
The Amended and Restated Executive Order issued June 5, 2020, and all Addenda and Directives issued thereunder, shall continue in full force and effect until midnight on November 15, 2020, at which time the Governor,
in consultation with the VDH and DPS shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend the State of Emergency.

This Addendum 6 to the Amended and Restated Executive Order shall take effect upon signing and shall continue in full force and effect until midnight on November 15, 2020, at which time the Governor, in consultation with the Vermont Department of Health
and the Department of Public Safety shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend this Addendum.

Dated October 15, 2020

ADDENDUM 7 TO AMENDED AND RESTATED EXECUTIVE ORDER 01-20

[Limiting Skating Facility Availability]

WHEREAS, as of October 16, 2020, the operations of New Hampshire skating facilities were closed by the Governor for two weeks in response to a COVID-19 outbreak which to date has resulted in 158 cases among 23 different ice hockey teams; and

WHEREAS, a COVID-19 outbreak among hockey leagues in central Vermont has expanded to 18 people; and

WHEREAS, in order to avoid an influx of new users into Vermont ice rinks/skating facilities, the Governor has determined to limit certain availability to Vermont ice rinks/skating facilities.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont by the Constitution of the State of Vermont, the emergency powers set forth in 20 V.S.A. §§ 8, 9 and 11 and other laws, hereby order all indoor ice rinks/skating
facilities to freeze their schedules and not take any additional reservations for use of the facilities for the period beginning October 16, 2020 at 5:00 p.m., through midnight on October 30, 2020.

The Vermont Agency of Commerce and Community Development (ACCD), in consultation with the Vermont Department of Health and the Agency of Natural Resources, shall review existing guidelines to determine if a more aggressive response is needed to prevent
further spread of COVID-19 related to indoor skating, hockey and other indoor recreational facilities.

This Addendum 7 to the Amended and Restated Executive Order shall take effect upon signing and shall continue in full force and effect until midnight on October 30, 2020.

Dated October 16, 2020

ADDENDUM 8 TO AMENDED AND RESTATED EXECUTIVE ORDER 01-20

[Extension of State of Emergency Declared March 13, 2020; Stay Safe/Stay Working/Stay in School]

WHEREAS, since December 2019, Vermont has been working in close collaboration with the National Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (“CDC”) and with the United States Health and Human Services Agency to first monitor and plan for outbreaks of a
respiratory illness due to a novel coronavirus (“COVID-19”) and then to implement measures to keep Vermonters healthy and safe; and

WHEREAS, the Governor directed the Vermont Department of Health (“VDH”) to activate the Health Operations Center in February 2020 when VDH began to monitor and later, test Vermonters who may have been exposed to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, in March 2020, the Governor directed the Department of Public Safety, Division of Vermont Emergency Management (“DPS”) to assemble an interagency taskforce, and later to activate the Vermont State Emergency Operations Center (“SEOC”), in accordance
with the State Emergency Management Plan, to organize prevention, response and mitigation efforts and share information with local and State officials; and

WHEREAS, on March 7, 2020 and March 11, 2020, VDH detected the first two cases of COVID-19 in Vermont and as of November 13, 2020, the State has experienced 2,651 cases and 59 deaths which are COVID-19 related; and

WHEREAS, on March 11, 2020 the World Health Organization made the assessment that COVID-19 can be characterized as a pandemic; and

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, the Governor issued Executive Order 01-20, Declaration of State of Emergency in Response to COVID-19 and National Guard Call-Out (“Executive Order”), declaring a State of emergency for the State of Vermont in response
to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, President Trump issued a national emergency declaration for the COVID-19 pandemic; and

WHEREAS, the Governor, in consultation with VDH, DPS and the Vermont Agency of Human Services, initiated aggressive and sustained efforts to protect property and public health, and to ensure public safety in this public health emergency including issuing
the Executive Order, as supplemented and amended and Directives issued pursuant to the Executive Order, to limit in-person contact, such as limiting the size of gatherings, closure of schools and the institution of remote learning
through the end of the 2019-2020 school year, directing the postponement of non-essential medical and surgical procedures, suspending the operation of close contact businesses, requiring telecommuting and work from home, requiring
Vermonters to stay home and stay safe, with exceptions for essential purposes, and suspending the operation of businesses which were not deemed critical to public health and safety and national and economic security; and

WHEREAS, modeling studies done for the State clearly show that, but for the mitigation measures taken to date, the number of COVID-19 cases and COVID-19 related deaths in the State would be having a much more devastating effect on Vermonters and would
be threatening to overwhelm the capacity of the Vermont health care system; and

WHEREAS, the Governor undertook a cautious, measured and data-based approach to restarting Vermont’s economy to minimize the risk to the public by limiting the spread of infection in our communities in order to protect the most vulnerable, while reopening
our business, non-profit, government and recreation sectors in a safe and effective way; and

WHEREAS, despite months of success, statewide there is an acceleration in COVID-19 transmission; from November 8, 2020 to November 12, 2020, the number of new cases reported statewide increased at a rate as high as 50% per day (from 23 to 47 to 72 and
to 109 cases); and

WHEREAS, in accordance with the Executive Order, as amended and restated, the Commissioner of VDH has determined that COVID-19 outbreaks have occurred, attributing this surge to a number of factors, primarily increased informal social gatherings involving
alcohol, both indoors and outdoors, among people of different households, thus increasing the exposure of Vermonters and visitors to COVID-19, spreading the disease into more homes and workplaces and threatening to overwhelm
our hospitals and health care resources; and

WHEREAS, the Commissioner has advised the Governor on the appropriate return to more limited standards of operation and social gatherings in order to control outbreaks of COVID-19, particularly among those who are elderly or already have underlying chronic
health conditions, minimize the risk to the public, maintain the health and safety of Vermonters and limit the spread of infection in our communities and within our healthcare facilities; and

WHEREAS, without a return to more limited standards of operation and social gatherings, as well as a requirement for greater cooperation by Vermonters with VDH contact tracing efforts, COVID-19 would likely continue to spread in Vermont at a rate similar
to the rate of spread in other states and countries, and the number of persons requiring medical care could exceed available resources; and

WHEREAS, the Governor has determined, in consultation with the Commissioner of VDH, that with Vermont’s aggressive advances in the areas of contact tracing, surveillance testing and diagnostic and surveillance testing, it is possible to limit standards
of operation and social gatherings, while keeping Vermonters working and our children in school; and

WHEREAS, Vermonters must come together as we have before in this crisis, to do our part to protect the very ill and elderly, ensure those who experience the most severe symptoms have access to the care they need, and keep our schools and economy open,
by preventing and slowing the spread of this virus; and

WHEREAS, the Governor has determined, in consultation with the Commissioner of VDH and DPS, based on the best science and data available, to extend the State of Emergency for the State of Vermont through Tuesday, December 15, 2020.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont by the Constitution of the State of Vermont, the emergency powers set forth in 20 V.S.A. §§ 8, 9 and 11 and other laws, hereby declare the State of Emergency
for the State of Vermont shall be extended through midnight on Tuesday, December 15, 2020.

IT IS FURTHER ORDERED:

1.
Except as modified herein, the Amended and Restated Executive Order issued June 5, 2020, and all Addenda and Directives issued thereunder, shall continue in full force and effect until midnight on December 15,
2020, at which time the Governor, in consultation with VDH and DPS shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend the State of Emergency.

2.

Temporary Limitations on Business Operations and Social Gatherings; Requirement for Cooperation with VDH Contact Tracing.

a.

Multiple Household Social Gatherings Suspended.
Because data shows that between October 1, 2020 and November 13th, 2020 71% of the cases in Vermont associated with an outbreak are associated with a private party or social gathering, attendance at all public
and private social, recreational and entertainment gatherings, indoor and outdoor, including large social gatherings incidental to ceremonies, holiday gatherings, parties and celebrations, shall be limited to participation
with only members of a single household. For the sake of clarity, nothing in this Order prohibits the gathering of members living in the same residence. Individuals who live alone may gather with no more than one other household.
Further, nothing in this order requires anyone to remain in a dangerous, unhealthy or otherwise unsafe household; likewise, nothing in this order prevents someone from taking in, housing, sheltering or assisting another individual
or individuals to relieve them of a dangerous, unhealthy or otherwise unsafe household. Finally, limited outdoor fitness activities involving no more than two individuals from different households are permitted, provided these
activities can be enjoyed while adhering to physical distancing and mask requirements, and require no physical contact. This includes, but is not limited to biking, hiking, walking, running and other outdoor fitness activities.

b.

Restaurant Hours and Seating Limits.
All 1st class licensees permitted to remain open, must be closed to in-person dining at 10:00 p.m., but may provide food and beverage alcohol, including spirit-based drinks and malt and vinous product accompanying
food orders through curbside pick-up, drive-through, and delivery services for off-site consumption after 10:00 p.m. in accordance with Agency of Commerce and Community Development (“ACCD”) Guidance. Restaurants must provide
seated dining service only and to no more than one household per table in accordance with Section 2(a) above as well as the occupancy limits set forth in ACCD Guidance.

c.
